Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0413.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 18221. (1) The Michigan board of psychology is created in the department. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the board consists of the following 9 voting members who must meet the requirements of part 161: 5 psychologists, including at least 1 nondoctoral psychologist, and 4 public members. (2) Beginning after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, all of the following apply to the board described in subsection (1): (a) The 4 public members shall continue in office for the remainder of their respective terms. When the term of office of the first public member expires, the governor shall not appoint a public member to fill that position but shall instead, subject to part 161, appoint 1 psychologist who holds a license under section 18223(1) to fill the position, thereby reducing the total number of public members on the board to 3 and increasing the number of psychologists who hold a license under section 18223(1) to 5. (b) The governor shall, subject to part 161, appoint 2 psychologists who hold a limited license under section 18223(3) to the board, thereby increasing the total number of psychologists who hold limited licenses on the board to 3 and the total number of voting members on the board to 11. (3) The terms of office of individual members of the board created under this section, except those appointed to fill vacancies, expire 4 years after appointment on December 31 of the year in which the term expires. Sec. 18223. (1) The department, in consultation with the board, shall promulgate rules that require an individual who is granted a license under this part to engage in the practice of psychology to, except as provided in this section, meet both of the following requirements: (a) Have been granted a doctoral degree in psychology, or a doctoral degree in a closely related field, from a doctoral degree program that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is offered by a regionally accredited or other college, university, or institution approved by the board, and includes education and training appropriate to the practice of psychology. (ii) Has obtained the Association of State and Provincial Psychology Boardsâ national register designation, has been accredited by the American Psychological Association or the Canadian Psychological Association, or has obtained a similar designation from or been accredited by an entity approved by the board. (b) Have not less than 1 year of postdoctoral experience in the practice of psychology in an organized health care setting or other arrangement, as established by the board. (2) To be granted a limited license to engage in the practice of psychology, an individual must hold a masterâs degree in psychology from a regionally accredited college, university, or institution approved by the board, and have the education, training, and experience appropriate to the practice of psychology, as established by the department, in consultation with the board. Except for duties performed as an employee of a governmental entity or of a nonprofit organization serving benevolent and charitable purposes, 2 limitations must be placed on a limited license granted to an individual under this subsection. The limitations must require supervision by a psychologist who has a license other than a limited license and must prohibit advertising or other representation to the public that will lead the public to believe the individual is engaging in the practice of psychology. A limited license granted under this subsection is renewable under part 161. An individual who is applying for a limited license under this subsection must have 1 year of supervised postgraduate experience in an organized health care setting or other arrangement, as established by the department, in consultation with the board. The postgraduate experience described in this subsection must be supervised by a psychologist who has a license other than a limited license, or if a psychologist who has a license other than a limited license is not available, by a psychologist who has at least a masterâs degree in psychology and at least 3 years of experience in the practice of psychology or by any other individual approved by the board. This subsection does not limit the ability to grant a limited license under section 16182. This subsection does not apply beginning 12 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added subsection (3). (3) Beginning 12 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, to be granted a limited license to engage in the practice of psychology, an individual must hold a masterâs degree in psychology from a regionally accredited college, university, or institution approved by the department in consultation with the board, and have the education, training, and experience appropriate to the practice of psychology, as established by the department, in consultation with the board. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an individual who is applying for a limited license under this subsection who is granted a masterâs degree in psychology before August 31, 2027, must have 2 years, totaling not less than 3,000 hours, of supervised postgraduate experience, and an individual who is granted a masterâs degree in psychology on or after August 31, 2027, must have 2 years, totaling not less than 4,000 hours, of supervised postgraduate experience. An individual who is satisfying the supervised postgraduate experience described in subsection (2) on or immediately before 12 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection must have 1 year of supervised postgraduate experience to be granted a limited license under this subsection. The postgraduate experience described in this subsection must be completed in an organized health care setting or other arrangement, as established by the department, in consultation with the board, and must be supervised by a psychologist who is granted a license under subsection (1) or, if a psychologist who is granted a license under subsection (1) is not available, by a psychologist who has at least a masterâs degree in psychology and at least 3 years of experience in the practice of psychology or by any other individual approved by the department, in consultation with the board. An individual who is granted a limited license under this subsection may engage in the practice of psychology without supervision and shall perform an act, task, or function within the practice of psychology for which the individual is qualified by education, training, or experience. An individual who holds a limited license under this subsection shall not perform, offer to perform, or represent that the individual is qualified to perform any of the acts, tasks, or functions within the scope of practice of psychology that the individual is not qualified by education, training, or experience to perform, or that the individual is otherwise prohibited by law from performing. An individual who holds a limited license under subsection (2) on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection is considered to hold a limited license under this subsection and is not subject to the limitations on the license as described in subsection (2). The department, in consultation with the board, shall promulgate rules to implement this subsection. This subsection does not limit the ability to grant a license under section 16182. (4) An individual described in subsection (2) or (3) must be granted a temporary license for the purpose of obtaining the postgraduate experience described in subsection (2) or (3). A temporary license granted under this subsection is valid for 24 months and may be renewed for 2 additional 24-month terms. If an individual described in subsection (2) was granted a temporary license by the board before March 31, 2018, the individualâs temporary license may be renewed for 1 additional 24-month term. (5) An individual who is enrolled in a doctoral degree program that meets the requirements of subsection (1) must be granted a temporary license. Beginning on March 31, 2018, a temporary license granted under this subsection is valid for 24 months and may be renewed for 3 additional 24-month terms. If an individual enrolled in a doctoral program that meets the requirements of subsection (1) was granted a temporary license before March 31, 2018, the individualâs temporary license may be renewed for 3 additional 24-month terms. (6) An individual whose temporary license under subsection (4) or (5) has lapsed for failure to renew the temporary license may apply for relicensure in accordance with section 16201. An individual who is relicensed may renew the temporary license described in subsection (4) or (5) for any 24-month term remaining before the temporary license lapsed. Sec. 18233. (1) In addition to the requirements of part 161, a licensee seeking renewal of a license shall furnish the department with satisfactory evidence that during the 2 years immediately preceding application for renewal, the licensee has attended continuing education courses or programs approved by the department, in consultation with the board, totaling not less than a number of hours established by rule in subjects related to the practice of psychology and designed to further educate licensees. (2) As required under section 16204, each applicant for license renewal must complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management as prescribed by rule. Sec. 18237. A psychologist or an individual under the psychologistâs supervision cannot be compelled to disclose confidential information acquired from an individual consulting the psychologist in the psychologistâs professional capacity if the information is necessary to enable the psychologist to render services. Information may be disclosed with the consent of the individual consulting the psychologist, or if the individual consulting the psychologist is a minor, with the consent of the minorâs guardian, pursuant to section 16222 if the psychologist reasonably believes it is necessary to disclose the information to comply with section 16222, or under section 16281. In a contest on the admission of a deceased individualâs will to probate, an heir at law of the decedent, whether a proponent or contestant of the will, and the personal representative of the decedent may waive the privilege created by this section. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor